Florida, session 2026, SB1010.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 44 45 Section 1.âParagraph (b) of subsection (5) of section 46 456.52, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 47 456.52âSex-reassignment prescriptions and procedures; 48 prohibitions; informed consent.â 49 (5) 50 (b)âAny health care practitioner who willfully or actively 51 participates, or aids or abets another, in a violation of 52 subsection (1) commits a felony of the third degree, punishable 53 as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 54 Section 2.âSection 766.318, Florida Statutes, is amended to 55 read: 56 766.318âCivil liability for provision of sex-reassignment 57 prescriptions or procedures to minors.â 58 (1)âA private cause of action exists to recover damages for 59 personal injury or death resulting from the provision of sex 60 reassignment prescriptions or procedures, as defined in s. 61 456.001, to a person younger than 18 years of age which are 62 prohibited by s. 456.52(1). An individual may recover all 63 economic and noneconomic damages for injuries he or she 64 sustained before or after turning 18 years of age which are the 65 result of sex-reassignment prescriptions or procedures provided 66 in violation of s. 456.52(1). 67 (2)âThe Attorney General may conduct investigations of 68 alleged violations of s. 456.52(1) and, if the Attorney General 69 determines that such a violation has occurred, may commence a 70 civil action under this subsection for damages, injunctive 71 relief, and civil penalties of up to $100,000 for each 72 violation. Any damages recovered pursuant to a civil action 73 brought under this subsection accrue to the benefit of the 74 individual injured as the result of sex-reassignment 75 prescriptions or procedures provided in violation of s. 76 456.52(1). 77 (3)(2)âThe limitations on punitive damages in s. 768.73(1) 78 do not apply to actions brought under this section. 79 (4)(3)âAn action brought under this section: 80 (a)âMay be commenced within 20 years after the cessation or 81 completion of the sex-reassignment prescription or procedure. 82 (b)âIs in addition to any other remedy authorized by law. 83 (5)(4)âThe cause of action created by this section does not 84 apply to: 85 (a)âTreatment with sex-reassignment prescriptions if such 86 treatment is consistent with s. 456.001(9)(a)1. or 2. and was 87 commenced on or before, and is still active on, May 17, 2023. 88 (b)âSex-reassignment prescriptions or procedures that were 89 ceased or completed on or before May 17, 2023. 90 Section 3.âSection 1014.07, Florida Statutes, is created to 91 read: 92 1014.07âCivil liability.â 93 (1)âA private cause of action exists against an employee of 94 the state, any of its political subdivisions, or any other 95 governmental entity who violates any of the parental rights 96 specified in s. 1014.04 or against a health care practitioner 97 who provides, solicits or arranges to provide, or aids or abets 98 another to provide health care services or prescription of 99 medicinal drugs to a minor child without parental consent in 100 violation of s. 1014.06. An individual may recover all economic 101 and noneconomic damages resulting from a violation of s. 1014.04 102 or s. 1014.06. All damages recovered pursuant to a civil action 103 brought under this subsection accrue to the benefit of the 104 affected minor. 105 (2)âThe Attorney General may conduct investigations of 106 alleged violations of s. 1014.04 or s. 1014.06 and, if the 107 Attorney General determines that such a violation has occurred, 108 may commence a civil action under this subsection for damages, 109 injunctive relief, and civil penalties of up to $100,000 for 110 each violation. All damages recovered pursuant to a civil action 111 brought under this subsection accrue to the benefit of the 112 affected minor. 113 (3)âThe limitations on punitive damages in s. 768.73(1) do 114 not apply to actions brought under this section. 115 (4)âAn action brought under this section: 116 (a)âMay be commenced within 2 years after the violation 117 occurs. 118 (b)âIs in addition to any other remedy authorized by law. 119 Section 4.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 120 made by this act to section 456.52, Florida Statutes, in a 121 reference thereto, paragraph (c) of subsection (5) of section 122 456.074, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 123 456.074âCertain health care practitioners; immediate 124 suspension of license.â 125 (5)âThe department shall issue an emergency order 126 suspending the license of any health care practitioner who is 127 arrested for committing or attempting, soliciting, or conspiring 128 to commit any act that would constitute a violation of any of 129 the following criminal offenses in this state or similar 130 offenses in another jurisdiction: 131 (c)âSection 456.52(5)(b), relating to prescribing, 132 administering, or performing sex-reassignment prescriptions or 133 procedures for a patient younger than 18 years of age. 134 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.